Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 21 Unclaimed Property

33-21-1.
Town taking possession of property.

Whenever any person shall die leaving any real estate within this state, and shall leave no heir or legal representative to claim the real estate, the town council of the town in which the real estate is located may direct the town treasurer of the town to take the property into his or her possession for the use of the town until the heir or other legal representative of the deceased shall call for the real estate, to whom the real estate shall be delivered on being claimed and evidence of the right or title of the claimant shown; and the town shall in that case account with the claimant for the real estate, but not including any income or interest received from the real estate.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 956; G.L. 1909, ch. 317, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 368, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 582, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-21-1

; P.L. 1961, ch. 195, § 1.

33-21-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

Former §

33-21-2

(C.P.A. 1905, § 958; G.L. 1909, ch. 317, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 368, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 582, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

33-21-2

) was repealed by P.L. 1961, ch. 195, § 2.

33-21-3.
Action for recovery of property.

If any person shall appear to be in possession of any real estate of one dying without known heirs or other legal representatives as provided in §

33-21-1

, and shall on request refuse to deliver or surrender possession of the real estate to the town treasurer directed as provided, the town treasurer may in his or her capacity commence and prosecute an action for the recovery of the real estate. For purposes of §§

33-21-1

and

33-21-3

—

33-21-6

, “real estate” shall not include real estate to the extent it constitutes the underlying security for any note, obligation, or other security owned by a person dying without known heirs, and the real estate to this extent shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter and chapter 21.1 of this title. The attorney general may be joined, on behalf of the state, as a party respondent in any action involving title to the real estate.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 959; G.L. 1909, ch. 317, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 368, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 582, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

33-21-3

; P.L. 1961, ch. 195, § 1.

33-21-4.
Subjection of estate to debts of decedent.

Whenever any real estate shall be taken into possession by any town treasurer pursuant to this chapter, the real estate shall be subject and liable to the payment of the debts of the deceased to whom it belonged, as liens on the property; and these liens may be established and enforced by proceedings brought by the creditors against the town as trustee, at any time within two (2) years after the town has taken possession.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 957; G.L. 1909, ch. 317, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 368, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 582, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

33-21-4

; P.L. 1961, ch. 195, § 1.

33-21-5.
Order for sale of real estate.

Whenever a town shall have been in possession of any real estate under the provisions of §

33-21-1

for ten (10) years without any person having claimed the same as heir at law, devisee, legatee, or legal representative of the deceased person, and shall, by complaint setting forth all the known facts in relation to the title and possession of the real estate and in relation to the person who died leaving the property, apply to the superior court for leave to sell and convey the real estate, the court shall order such notice of the pendency of the complaint as may to the court seem proper, and may, after the return of the notice and the hearing of all persons interested in the real estate, order the sale and conveyance of real estate in such manner and upon such terms and conditions as the court shall prescribe.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 963; G.L. 1909, ch. 317, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 368, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 582, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

33-21-5

.

33-21-6.
Proceeds of sale.

The proceeds of a sale, and the balance of any proceeds after proceedings by creditors under §

33-21-4

, over and above all expenses incurred by the town, shall be held by the town and be accounted for in the same way and be held for the same uses as the real estate would have been had no sale been made.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 964; G.L. 1909, ch. 317, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 368, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 582, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

33-21-6

.

33-21-7 — 33-21-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

Former §§

33-21-7

— 33-21-9 (C.P.A. 1905, §§ 960-962; G.L. 1909, ch. 317, §§ 5-7; G.L. 1923, ch. 368, §§ 5-7; G.L. 1938, ch. 582, §§ 5-7; G.L. 1956, §§

33-21-7

to 33-21-9) were repealed by P.L. 1961, ch. 195, § 2.

33-21-10.
Record of proceedings.

The town treasurer shall keep an exact record of his or her proceedings under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 965; G.L. 1909, ch. 317, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 368, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 582, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

33-21-10

.

33-21-11 — 33-21-43.
Repealed.

History of Section.

Former §§

33-21-11

— 33-21-40 (G.L. 1956, §§

33-21-11

— 33-21-40; P.L. 1968, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 205, art. X, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 351, §§ 1, 2, 3; P.L. 1979, ch. 118, §§ 1, 3; P.L. 1979, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 364, § 1), concerning unclaimed property, were repealed by P.L. 1986, ch. 500, § 2, effective July 1, 1987. For comparable provisions, see §

33-21-1

et seq. and §

33-21.1-1

et seq. Former §§ 33-21-41 — 33-21-43 (G.L. 1956, 33-21-41 to 33-21-43, as enacted by P.L. 1961, ch. 195, § 6) were repealed by P.L. 1968, ch. 256, § 2.